Wisconsin, session 2025, SB562.
do enact as follows:SB562,11Section 1. 238.03 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB562,2,162238.03 (3) (a) That Except as provided in sub. (3m), that each recipient of a 3grant or loan under the program of at least $100,000 $500,000 submit to the 4corporation, within 120 days after the end of the recipient’s fiscal year in which any 5grant or loan funds were expended the program expenditures are completed, a 6schedule of expenditures of the grant or loan funds, including expenditures of any 7matching cash or in-kind match, signed by the director or principal officer of the 8recipient to attest to the accuracy of the schedule of expenditures. The recipient 9shall engage an independent certified public accountant to perform procedures, 10approved by the corporation and consistent with applicable professional standards 11of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, to determine whether 12the grant or loan funds and any matching cash or in-kind match were expended in 13accordance with the grant or loan contract. The board shall also require the 14recipient of such a grant or loan to make available for inspection the documents 15supporting the schedule of expenditures. The board shall include the requirements 16under this paragraph in the contract with grant or loan recipients.SB562,217Section 2. 238.03 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB562,2,2018238.03 (3m) (a) In this subsection, “local governmental unit” means a city, 19village, town, county, special purpose district, or federally recognized American 20Indian tribe or band in this state.SB562,3,31(b) The board may not require a local governmental unit or a university in the 2University of Wisconsin System to comply with sub. (3) (a) if all of the following 3apply:SB562,3,641. The local governmental unit or university includes all funding received 5from the corporation in the local governmental unit’s or university’s current audit 6practices.SB562,3,1172. The local governmental unit or university, no later than 120 days after the 8end of the program period, submits to the corporation documentation of the local 9governmental unit’s or university’s standard annual audit for every fiscal year in 10which the local governmental unit or university expended grant or loan funds 11under the program.SB562,3,1312(c) The board shall include the requirements under par. (b) in a contract with 13a local governmental unit or a university in the University of Wisconsin System.SB562,3,1414